Maryland, session 2026, HB0942.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–504.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A CUSTODY ORDER OVER WHICH A COURT OF
THE STATE HAS JURISDICTION.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY INTERFERE WITH A
CUSTODY ORDER, BY ENTICING OR PERSUADING A MINOR AWAY OR WITHHOLDING A
MINOR FROM:
(1) THE MINOR’S LAWFUL CUSTODIAN;
(2) A COURT–APPOINTED GUARDIAN; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0942*

HOUSE BILL 942
(3) A PERSON LAWFULLY STANDING IN LOCO PARENTIS.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, SHALL RECEIVE A WRITTEN WARNING;
(2) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $250;
(3) FOR A THIRD OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $500;
(4) FOR A FOURTH OFFENSE, IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON
CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 30 DAYS; AND
(5) FOR A FIFTH OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 1 YEAR.
(D) A WRITTEN WARNING FOR A VIOLATION ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(1) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL BE SIGNED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER ISSUING
THE WARNING; AND
(2) SHALL CONTAIN:
(I) THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND DATE OF BIRTH OF THE PERSON
IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION;
(II) THE DATE AND TIME THAT THE VIOLATION OCCURRED;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF THE VIOLATION THAT OCCURRED; AND
(IV) NOTICE OF THE POTENTIAL PENALTIES THAT MAY BE
IMPOSED FOR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.